test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Prop-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
  Propernouns:
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Nom: Abja
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Abjagi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: Abjasse
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Abjassegi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Com: Abjaga
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Abjagagi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Abe: Abjata
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Abjatagi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ess: Abjana
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Abjanagi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Trm: Abjani
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Abjanigi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Tra: Abjaks
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Abjakski
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Abl: Abjalt
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Abjaltki
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ade: Abjal
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Abjalgi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+All: Abjale
      Abja+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Abjalegi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ela: Abjast
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Abjastki
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ine: Abjas
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Abjaski
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Gen: Abja
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Abjagi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Par: Abjat
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Abjatki
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Nom: Abjad
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Abjadki
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Par: Abjasid
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ill: Abjadesse
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Abjadessegi
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Com: Abjadega
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Abjadegagi
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Abe: Abjadeta
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Abjadetagi
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ess: Abjadena
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Abjadenagi
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Trm: Abjadeni
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Abjadenigi
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Tra: Abjadeks
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Abjadekski
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Abl: Abjadelt
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Abjadeltki
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ade: Abjadel
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Abjadelgi
      Abja+Prop+Pl+All: Abjadele
      Abja+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Abjadelegi
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ela: Abjadest
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Abjadestki
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ine: Abjades
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Abjadeski
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Gen: Abjade
      Abja+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Abjadegi
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ill: Apja
      Abja+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Apjagi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Nom: Braille
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Braillegi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ill: Braille'sse
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Braille'ssegi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Com: Braille'ga
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Braille'gagi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Abe: Braille'ta
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Braille'tagi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ess: Braille'na
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Braille'nagi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Trm: Braille'ni
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Braille'nigi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Tra: Braille'ks
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Braille'kski
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Abl: Braille'lt
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Braille'ltki
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ade: Braille'l
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Braille'lgi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+All: Braille'le
      Braille+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Braille'legi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ela: Braille'st
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Braille'stki
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ine: Braille's
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Braille'ski
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Gen: Braille'
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Braille'gi
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Par: Braille'd
      Braille+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Braille'dki
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Nom: Braille'd
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Braille'dki
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Par: Braille'sid
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: Braille'sidki
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ill: Braille'desse
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Braille'dessegi
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Com: Braille'dega
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Braille'degagi
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Abe: Braille'deta
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Braille'detagi
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ess: Braille'dena
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Braille'denagi
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Trm: Braille'deni
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Braille'denigi
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Tra: Braille'deks
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Braille'dekski
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Abl: Braille'delt
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Braille'deltki
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ade: Braille'del
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Braille'delgi
      Braille+Prop+Pl+All: Braille'dele
      Braille+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Braille'delegi
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ela: Braille'dest
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Braille'destki
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ine: Braille'des
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Braille'deski
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Gen: Braille'de
      Braille+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Braille'degi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kunda
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Kundagi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kunda
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Kundagi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: Kundasse
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundassegi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Com: Kundaga
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Kundagagi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Abe: Kundata
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Kundatagi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ess: Kundana
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Kundanagi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Trm: Kundani
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Kundanigi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Tra: Kundaks
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Kundakski
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Abl: Kundalt
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Kundaltki
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ade: Kundal
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Kundalgi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+All: Kundale
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Kundalegi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ela: Kundast
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Kundastki
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ine: Kundas
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Kundaski
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Gen: Kunda
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Kundagi
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Par: Kundat
      Kunda+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Kundatki
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Nom: Kundad
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Kundadki
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Par: Kundaid
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: Kundaidki
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: Kundaisse
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundaissegi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: Kundaiks
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundaikski
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: Kundailt
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundailtki
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: Kundail
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundailgi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+All+Use/Rare: Kundaile
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundailegi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: Kundaist
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundaistki
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: Kundais
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Kundaiski
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ill: Kundatesse
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Kundatessegi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Com: Kundatega
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Kundategagi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Abe: Kundateta
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Kundatetagi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ess: Kundatena
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Kundatenagi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Trm: Kundateni
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Kundatenigi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Tra: Kundateks
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Kundatekski
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Abl: Kundatelt
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Kundateltki
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ade: Kundatel
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Kundatelgi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+All: Kundatele
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Kundatelegi
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ela: Kundatest
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Kundatestki
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ine: Kundates
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Kundateski
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Gen: Kundate
      Kunda+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Kundategi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Nom: Leedu
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Leedugi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: Leedusse
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Leedussegi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Com: Leeduga
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Leedugagi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Abe: Leeduta
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Leedutagi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ess: Leeduna
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Leedunagi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Trm: Leeduni
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Leedunigi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Tra: Leeduks
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Leedukski
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Abl: Leedult
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Leedultki
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ade: Leedul
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Leedulgi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+All: Leedule
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Leedulegi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ela: Leedust
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Leedustki
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ine: Leedus
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Leeduski
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Gen: Leedu
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Leedugi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Par: Leedut
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Leedutki
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Nom: Leedud
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Leedudki
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Par: Leedusid
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ill: Leedudesse
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Leedudessegi
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Com: Leedudega
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Leedudegagi
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Abe: Leedudeta
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Leedudetagi
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ess: Leedudena
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Leedudenagi
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Trm: Leedudeni
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Leedudenigi
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Tra: Leedudeks
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Leedudekski
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Abl: Leedudelt
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Leedudeltki
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ade: Leedudel
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Leedudelgi
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+All: Leedudele
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Leedudelegi
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ela: Leedudest
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Leedudestki
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ine: Leedudes
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Leedudeski
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Gen: Leedude
      Leedu+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Leedudegi
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ill: Leetu
      Leedu+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Leetugi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Nom: Läti
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Lätigi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: Lätisse
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Lätissegi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Com: Lätiga
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Lätigagi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Abe: Lätita
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Lätitagi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ess: Lätina
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Lätinagi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Trm: Lätini
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Lätinigi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Tra: Lätiks
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Lätikski
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Abl: Lätilt
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Lätiltki
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ade: Lätil
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Lätilgi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+All: Lätile
      Läti+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Lätilegi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ela: Lätist
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Lätistki
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ine: Lätis
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Lätiski
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Gen: Läti
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Lätigi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Par: Lätit
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Lätitki
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Nom: Lätid
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Lätidki
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Par: Lätisid
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ill: Lätidesse
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Lätidessegi
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Com: Lätidega
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Lätidegagi
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Abe: Lätideta
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Lätidetagi
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ess: Lätidena
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Lätidenagi
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Trm: Lätideni
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Lätidenigi
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Tra: Lätideks
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Lätidekski
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Abl: Lätidelt
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Lätideltki
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ade: Lätidel
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Lätidelgi
      Läti+Prop+Pl+All: Lätidele
      Läti+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Lätidelegi
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ela: Lätidest
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Lätidestki
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ine: Lätides
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Lätideski
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Gen: Lätide
      Läti+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Lätidegi
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ill: Lätti
      Läti+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Lättigi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ill: Randu
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Randugi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Nom: Rannu
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Rannugi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: Rannusse
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Rannussegi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Com: Rannuga
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Rannugagi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Abe: Rannuta
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Rannutagi
